Utah statutes.
58-71-304.2.   Temporary license.
(1)  The division may issue a temporary license to an individual who:
(a)  meets all qualifications for licensure except completion of the 12 month
clinical experience required under Section 58-71-302; and
(b)  presents a plan acceptable to the division and the board under which the
applicant will practice under the direct supervision of a licensed
naturopathic physician, physician and surgeon, or osteopathic physician, who
supervises not more than three naturopathic physicians in an approved clinical
experience program.
(2)  A temporary license issued under this section expires on the date the
licensee completes the clinical experience program, but not more than 18
months from the original date of issue.
(3)  A temporary license under this section may be issued only once to an
individual.
